Utah statutes.
78B-15-622.   Order adjudicating parentage.
(1)  The tribunal shall issue an order adjudicating whether a man alleged or
claiming to be the father is the parent of the child.
(2)  An order adjudicating parentage must identify the child by name and date
of birth.
(3)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (4), the tribunal may assess
filing fees, reasonable attorney fees, fees for genetic testing, other costs,
necessary travel, and other reasonable expenses incurred in a proceeding under
this part.  The tribunal may award attorney fees, which may be paid directly
to the attorney, who may enforce the order in the attorney's own name.
(4)  The tribunal may not assess fees, costs, or expenses against the support-
enforcement agency of this state or another state, except as provided by law.
(5)  On request of a party and for good cause shown, the tribunal may order
that the name of the child be changed.
(6)  If the order of the tribunal is at variance with the child's birth
certificate, the tribunal shall order the Office of Vital Records to issue an
amended birth registration.
